Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.030

Licensing required.

No person may represent himself or herself as a licensed denturist or use any title or description of services without applying for licensure, meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed as a denturist by the board, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

[ 2013 c 171 s 1; 1995 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]